Nebraska, session 109, LB1089.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1089 LB1089
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-3808, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-3808 (1) The Commissioner of Labor shall issue a citation to an
employer when an investigation reveals that the employer may have
violated the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act.
(2) When a citation is issued, the commissioner shall notify the
employer of the proposed administrative penalty, if any, by certified
mail, by any other manner of delivery by which the United States Postal
Service can verify delivery, or by any method of service recognized under
Chapter 25, article 5. The administrative penalty shall not be more than
five hundred dollars in the case of a first violation and not more than
five thousand dollars in the case of a second or subsequent violation.
(3) The employer has fifteen working days after the date of the
citation or penalty to contest such citation or penalty. Notice of
contest shall be sent to the commissioner who shall provide a hearing in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) Any employer who has an unpaid citation for a violation of the
Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act shall be barred from
contracting with the state or any political subdivision until such
citation is paid. If a citation has been contested as described in
subsection (3) of this section, it shall not be considered an unpaid
citation under this subsection until after such contest has been
resolved.
(5) Citations issued under this section and the names of employers
who have been issued a citation shall be made available to the public
upon request, except that this subsection shall not apply to any
citations that are being contested as described in subsection (3) of this
section.
(6) An employee having a claim for a violation of the Nebraska
Healthy Families and Workplaces Act may institute suit for legal and
equitable relief in the proper court. In any action brought to enforce
-2-

LB1089 LB1089
2026 2026
the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act, the court shall have
jurisdiction to grant such legal or equitable relief as the court deems
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of the act. If an employee
establishes a claim and secures judgment on the claim, such employee
shall also be entitled to recover the full amount of the judgment and all
costs of such suit, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(7) If an employee institutes suit against an employer under
subsection (6) of this section, any citation that is issued against an
employer under subsection (1) of this section and that relates directly
to the facts in dispute shall be admitted into evidence unless
specifically excluded by the court. If a citation has been contested as
described in subsection (3) of this section, it shall not be admitted
into evidence under this subsection until such contest has been resolved.
(8) A civil action brought under this section shall be commenced no
later than one calendar year after the cause of action accrues.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-3808, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-3-